Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 27. Private Roads

§ 2701.
Intent.

The intent of this chapter is to state the responsibilities for the maintenance of a private road, in the absence of an express agreement or requirement governing such maintenance responsibilities, in accordance with the Vermont Supreme Court decision of
Hubbard v. Bolieau,
144 Vt. 373 (1984), which draws upon established principles of Vermont law.
This chapter will only apply to resolve conflicts regarding maintenance of private roads in the absence of an express agreement or requirement.
The provisions of this chapter are not intended to abridge, enlarge, or modify any right provided under

Hubbard

and the common law of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2702.
Private road maintenance.

In the absence of an express agreement or requirement governing maintenance of a private road, when more than one person enjoys a common benefit from a private road each person shall contribute rateably to the cost of maintaining the private road and shall have the right to bring a civil action to enforce the requirement of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular cases.

There was no merit to the argument of the owners of “large lots” within a residential subdivision that they received no benefit from the roads and thus should not have to contribute. The homeowners clearly received an ongoing benefit from the homeowners’ association’s road maintenance and their continuing right to access their own property; given the benefit they received, it was equitable, and consistent with statute, for them to contribute to maintenance of the road network within the development whether they used all the roads or not. Khan v. Alpine Haven Prop. Owners' Ass'n, 2020 VT 90, 213 Vt. 453, 245 A.3d 1234, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 98 (2020).